Vermont statutes. Title 16 Education
Subchapter 1. General Provisions

§ 1071.
School year and school day.

Minimum number of days. Except as provided in this section, each public school shall be maintained and operated for:

At least 175 student attendance days in each school year. For purposes of this section, a majority of students enrolled in a school must be recorded on the school roll as in attendance on any day counted as a student attendance day.

At least five teacher in-service education days, during which time activities shall be conducted without students present in order to increase the competency of the staff, improve the curriculum of the school, enable teachers to attend State educational meetings, or disseminate student progress information to parents or the community.

Hours of operation. Within the minimum set by the State Board, the school board shall fix the number of hours that shall constitute a school day, subject to change upon the order of the State Board.

Unanticipated closings. When a public school is closed for cause beyond the control of the school board, it may petition the State Board for a waiver of the requirements of this section. The petition shall be filed with the State Board within 10 days of each occurrence and not later than June 15 of the school year involved; and the State Board shall act on the petition at its next meeting. If the petition is approved and a waiver granted, the school district shall be deemed to have satisfied the requirements of this section. If the State Board fails to act at that meeting, the petition shall be deemed to have been approved and the waiver granted.

[Repealed.]

Regional calendar. Before April 1 of each year, the superintendents of schools and the headmasters of public schools not managed by school boards in an area shall meet, and by majority vote, establish a uniform calendar within that area for the following school year. The calendar shall include student attendance days, periods of vacation, holidays, and teacher in-service education days and shall comply with subsection (a) of this section. Unless permitted by the Secretary, no area served by a regional career technical center shall be divided into two or more calendar regions.

Additional days. Nothing in this section prohibits a school from scheduling additional days for student attendance or teacher in-service education. However, those days shall not conflict with any applicable school calendar.

Upon application of one or more school districts, after approval by the voters of each such district, the State Board may grant a waiver of the requirements of subsection (a) of this section if it is satisfied that equivalent educational programming will be maintained or improved. The waiver may be granted for any purpose, including the conservation of energy.

HISTORY:

Amended

1969, No. 298

(Adj. Sess.),§§ 7, 79;

1971, No. 17

;

1979, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.);

1981, No. 47

, § 1;

1983, No. 163

(Adj. Sess.);

1991, No. 204

(Adj. Sess.), § 7;

1995, No. 130

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1999, No. 49

, § 22, eff. June 2, 1999;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 113, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.

§ 1072.
Legal holidays.

All conditions of employment relating to legal holidays, including decisions such as the closing or opening of schools and compensation for work performed on a holiday, shall be proper matters for collective bargaining pursuant to chapter 57 of this title.

HISTORY:

Amended

1975, No. 48

, § 9, eff. April 15, 1975;

1985, No. 251

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 114, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.

§ 1073.
“Legal pupil” defined; access to school.

Definition. “Legal pupil” means an individual who has attained the age of five years on or before January 1 next following the beginning of the school year. However, a school district may require that students admitted to kindergarten have attained the age of five on or before any date between August 31 and January 1.

Access to school.

Right to a public education. No legal pupil attending school at public expense, including a married, pregnant, or parenting student, shall be deprived of or denied the opportunity to participate in or complete a public school education.

Right to enroll in a public or independent school. Notwithstanding the provisions of sections 822 and 1075 of this title, a pregnant or parenting student may enroll in any approved public school in Vermont or an adjacent state, any approved independent school in Vermont, or any other educational program approved by the State Board in which any other legal pupil in Vermont may enroll.

Teen parent education program.

Residential teen parent education programs. The Secretary shall pay the educational costs for a pregnant or parenting student attending a State Board-approved teen parent education program in a 24-hour residential facility for up to eight months after the birth of the child. The Secretary may approve extension of payment of educational costs based on a plan for reintegration of the student into the community or for exceptional circumstances as determined by the Secretary. The district of residence of a student in a 24-hour residential facility shall remain responsible for coordination of the student’s educational program and for planning and facilitating her subsequent educational program.

Nonresidential teen parent education programs.

The pregnant or parenting student’s district of residence or the approved independent or public school to which that district pays tuition for its students (the enrolling school) shall be responsible for planning, coordinating, and assessing the enrolled student’s education plan while attending a teen parent education program and for planning, assessing, and facilitating the student’s subsequent education plan, including the student’s transition back to the public or approved independent school. As determined by the district of residence or the enrolling school, as appropriate, the student’s educational plan while attending a teen parent education program shall include learning experiences that are the substantial equivalent of the learning experiences required by the district of residence or the enrolling school to obtain a high school diploma.

A pregnant or parenting student may attend a nonresidential teen parent education program for a length of time to be determined by agreement of the student’s district of residence, the enrolling school, the teen parent education program, and the student.

In the event of a dispute regarding any aspect of this subdivision (B), the district of residence, the enrolling school, the teen parent education program, or the student, or any combination of these, may request a determination from the Secretary whose decision shall be final; any determination by the Secretary regarding “substantial equivalency” pursuant to subdivision (i) of this subdivision (b)(3)(B) shall be based on the Secretary’s analysis of the course syllabus or the course description provided by the district of residence or enrolling school.

Prekindergarten and essential early education. An individual who is not a legal pupil may be enrolled in a public school in a prekindergarten program offered by or through a public school pursuant to rules adopted under section 829 of this title or in a program of essential early education offered pursuant to section 2956 of this title.

HISTORY:

Amended

1971, No. 243

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1979, No. 124

(Adj. Sess.);

1983, No. 247

(Adj. Sess.), § 4(6);

1985, No. 71

, § 6;

1991, No. 21

, § 1;

1995, No. 157

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

1997, No. 147

(Adj. Sess.), § 153a, eff. April 29, 1998;

2007, No. 62

, § 5;

2009, No. 44

, § 34, eff. May 21, 2009;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 115, eff. Feb. 14, 2014;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 72.

§ 1074.
Age of student; “between” defined.

The word “between,” as used in this title in respect to a specified age of a student, shall mean the period of time commencing on the birthday of the child when he or she becomes the age first specified and ending on the day next preceding the birthday of the child when he or she becomes the age last specified.

HISTORY:

Amended

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 116, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.

§ 1075.
Legal residence defined; responsibility and payment of education of student.

For the purpose of this title, except as otherwise set forth, the legal residence or residence of a student shall be as follows:

In the case of a minor, legal residence is where his or her parents reside, except that:

if the parents live apart, legal residence is where either parent resides, but if a parent with sole custody lives outside the State of Vermont, the student does not have a legal residence in Vermont;

if the minor is in the custody of a legal guardian appointed by a Vermont court or a court of competent jurisdiction in another state, territory, or country, legal residence is where the guardian resides.

In the case of a student who has reached the age of majority, legal residence is where the student resides.

For the purposes of this title, “resident” of the State and of a school district means a natural person who is domiciled in the school district and who, if temporarily absent, demonstrates an intent to maintain a principal dwelling place in the school district indefinitely and to return there, coupled with an act or acts consistent with that intent. The term “temporarily absent” includes those special cases listed in

17 V.S.A. § 2122(a)

. The term “residence” is synonymous with the term “domicile.” A married person may have a domicile independent of the domicile of his or her spouse. If a person removes to another town with the intention of remaining there indefinitely, that person shall be considered to have lost residence in the town in which the person originally resided even though the person intends to return at some future time. A person may have only one residence at a given time.

The Secretary shall determine the legal residence of all State-placed students pursuant to the provisions of this section. In all other cases, the student’s legal residence shall be determined by the school board of the district in which the student is seeking enrollment or, if the student is seeking payment of tuition, the school board from which the student is seeking tuition payment. If a student is denied enrollment at any stage, the student and his or her parent or guardian shall be notified in writing, within 24 hours, of the provisions of this section. If the student is not in attendance as a result of a preliminary decision by school officials and a decision from the school board will not be available by the end of the second school day after the request for enrollment is made, the Secretary may issue a temporary order requiring enrollment. Any interested person or taxpayer who is dissatisfied with the decision of the school board as to the student’s legal residence may appeal to the Secretary, who shall determine the student’s legal residence, and the decision of the Secretary shall be final. Pending appeal under this subsection, the Secretary shall issue a temporary order requiring enrollment.

State-placed students.

A State-placed student in the legal custody of the Commissioner for Children and Families, other than one placed in a 24-hour residential facility and except as otherwise provided in this subsection, shall be educated by the student’s school of origin, unless the student’s education team determines that it is not in the student’s best interests to attend the school of origin. The student’s education team shall include, as applicable, the student, the student’s parents and foster parents, the student’s guardian ad litem and educational surrogate parent, representatives of both the school of origin and potential new school, and a representative of the Family Services Division of the Department for Children and Families. In the case of a dispute about whether it is in the student’s best interests to attend the school of origin, the Commissioner for Children and Families shall make the final decision. As used in this section, “school of origin” means the school in which the child was enrolled at the time of placement into custody of the Commissioner for Children and Families, or in the case of a student already in the custody of the Commissioner for Children and Families, the school the student most recently attended.

If a student is a State-placed student pursuant to subdivision 11(a)(28)(D)(i)(I) of this title, then the Department for Children and Families shall be responsible for the student’s transportation to and from school, unless the receiving district chooses to provide transportation.

A State-placed student not in the legal custody of the Commissioner for Children and Families, other than one placed in a 24-hour residential facility and except as otherwise provided in this subsection, shall be educated by the school district in which the student is living, unless an alternative plan or facility for the education of the student is agreed upon by the Secretary. In the case of dispute as to where a State-placed student is living, the Secretary shall conduct a hearing to determine which school district is responsible for educating the student. The Secretary’s decision shall be final.

A student who is in temporary legal custody pursuant to

33 V.S.A. § 5308(b)(3)

or (4) and is a State-placed student pursuant to subdivision 11(a)(28)(D)(i)(II) of this title shall be enrolled, at the temporary legal custodian’s discretion, in the district in which the student’s parents reside, the district in which either parent resides if the parents live in different districts, the district in which the student’s legal guardian resides, or the district in which the temporary legal custodian resides. If the student enrolls in the district in which the temporary legal custodian resides, the district shall provide transportation in the same manner and to the same extent it is provided to other students in the district. In all other cases, the temporary legal custodian is responsible for the student’s transportation to and from school, unless the receiving district chooses to provide transportation.

If a student who had been a State-placed student pursuant to subdivision 11(a)(28) of this title is returned to live in the district in which one or more of the student’s parents or legal guardians reside, then, at the request of the student’s parent or legal guardian, the Secretary may order the student to continue his or her enrollment for the remainder of the academic year in the district in which the student resided prior to returning to the parent’s or guardian’s district, and the student will continue to be funded as a State-placed student. Unless the receiving district chooses to provide transportation:

If the student remains in the legal custody of the Commissioner for Children and Families, then the Department for Children and Families shall assume responsibility for the student’s transportation to and from school.

In all other instances under this subdivision (4), the parent or legal guardian is responsible for the student’s transportation.

[Repealed.]

For the purposes of this title, the legal residence or residence of a child of homeless parents is the child’s school of origin, as defined in subdivision (c)(1) of this section, unless the parents and another school district agree that the child’s attendance in school in that school district will be in the best interests of the child. A “child of homeless parents” means a child whose parents:

lack a fixed, regular, and adequate residence; or

have a primary nighttime residence in a supervised publicly or privately operated shelter for temporary accommodations such as public assistance hotels, emergency shelters, battered women’s shelters, and transitional housing facilities, or a public or private place not designated for, or ordinarily used as, a regular sleeping accommodation for human beings.

For the purposes of this title, the legal residence of an alien, immigrant, or refugee child shall be determined in the same manner as in subsection (e) of this section, unless the child’s parents have established a residence in the State.

[Repealed.]

For the purposes of this title, the legal residence or residence of an independent student is where the independent student resides. “Independent student” as used in this subsection means a child between the ages of 14 and 18 years who by the acts and expressions of the child and his or her parents or legal guardian has demonstrated that he or she is living separate and apart from his or her parents or legal guardian, is independent of the authority of his or her parents or legal guardian, and is not economically dependent upon his or her parents or legal guardian. For the purposes of this subsection, the term “independent student” shall also include “emancipated minor” as that term is defined in

12 V.S.A. § 7151(a)

.

The Commissioner for Children and Families shall continue to provide social services and financial support in accordance with section 2950 of this title on behalf of individuals under his or her care and custody while in a residential placement, until they reach their 19th birthday.

A claim or statement of fact bearing on residency shall be subject to

13 V.S.A. § 3016

.

[Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Amended

1967, No. 147

, § 25;

1973, No. 152

(Adj. Sess.), § 8, eff. April 14, 1974;

1975, No. 48

, § 10, eff. April 15, 1975;

1977, No. 194

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1979, No. 6

, § 1, eff. March 2, 1979;

1981, No. 153

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1985, No. 51

;

1989, No. 187

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

1989, No. 233

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1991, No. 21

, §§ 2, 3;

1995, No. 145

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

1995, No. 157

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 5, 30(a)(2), 30(c), and § 29 (eff. July 1, 1997);

1995, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

2003, No. 36

, § 8;

2009, No. 44

, § 15, eff. May 21, 2009;

2011, No. 58

, § 10, eff. May 31, 2011;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 117, eff. Feb. 14, 2014;

2017, No. 49

, § 28;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 73.

§ 1076.
Penalties.

A superintendent or truant officer who fails to perform the duties imposed on him or her by this chapter shall be fined not more than $100.00.

A teacher who violates a provision of this chapter shall be fined not more than $25.00 nor less than $5.00.

HISTORY:

Amended

1967, No. 147

, § 26, eff. Oct. 1, 1968;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 118, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.

§§ 1077-1092.
[Reserved for future use.]

§ 1093.
Nonresident students.

A school board may receive into the schools under its charge nonresident students under such terms and restrictions as it deems best, and money received for the instruction of the students shall be paid into the school fund of the district.

HISTORY:

Amended

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 120, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.